Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Unemployment Compensation § 1 et seq.

81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare §§ 52 to 70.

§ 27-3-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] is and may be cited as the “Wyoming Employment Security Law”.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 1; 1941, ch. 96, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 54-101; W.S. 1957, § 27-22; Laws 1971, ch. 253, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

The Unemployment Compensation Act was held not unconstitutional for failure to include all employers on taxable list, particularly for exempting farmers and ranchers. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

The Unemployment Compensation Act was held not unconstitutional because it placed burden of providing economic security upon employers only, as distinction exists between employers and employees generally. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

The Unemployment Compensation Act did not violate art. 1, § 34, Wyo. Const., since the constitutional provision was satisfied by the statute applying uniformly within a class of persons, based on reasonable distinction, or objects of reasonable class, and operating the same in all parts of the state under the same circumstances. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Provisions of the Unemployment Compensation Act constituted a continuing appropriation for a specific purpose and were not in violation of art. 3, § 35, Wyo. Const.Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

General, not special, law. —

The Unemployment Compensation Act embraced a group of objects or class of subjects and was not, accordingly, a special, but is a general, law, unless exemption of certain employers made the classification unreasonable. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Employment Security Law deemed in pari materia with Real Estate Brokers and Salesmen Act. —

Ben Realty Co. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 416 P.2d 220,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1966).

History of earlier provisions. —

See Janssen v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 64 Wyo. 330, 192 P.2d 606,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1948).

Quoted

in

Casper Iron & Metal, Inc. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n of Dep't of Emp., 845 P.2d 387,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Bettcher v. Wyoming Dep't of Emp., 884 P.2d 635,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1994); Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999); Brock v. Wyo. ex rel. Wyo. Workforce Servs., Unemployment Ins. Div., 2017 WY 47, 394 P.3d 460,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality, construction and application of provision of unemployment compensation act subjecting to its provisions an employer purchasing or succeeding to the business of another employer, 4 ALR2d 721.

Benefits where, during the base year, employee worked in different states for same employer, 9 ALR2d 646.

Unemployment compensation as affected by employee's or employer's removal from place of employment, 13 ALR2d 874; 21 ALR4th 317.

Declaratory relief with respect to unemployment compensation, 14 ALR2d 826.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty, 18 ALR2d 268.

Effect of vacation, holiday or payment in lieu of unemployment compensation, 30 ALR2d 366, 3 ALR4th 557, 14 ALR4th 1175.

Termination of employment as a result of union action or pursuant to union contract as “voluntary” for purposes of unemployment compensation benefits, 90 ALR2d 835.

Injured person's receipt of statutory disability unemployment benefits as affecting recovery against tortfeasor, 4 ALR3d 535.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment to become self-employed or to go into business for oneself as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 45 ALR5th 715.

What constitutes “agricultural” of “farm” labor within social security or unemployment compensation acts, 60 ALR5th 459.

§ 27-3-102.
Definitions generally.

Except as otherwise provided, as used in this act:

“Base period” means the first four (4) of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of an individual’s benefit year or any other twelve (12) month period specified by commission regulation. A calendar quarter used in one (1) base period of a valid claim shall not be used in a subsequent base period. If a combined wage claim under W.S.

27-3-608

, the base period is as provided under law of the paying state;

“Benefit” means a payment to an individual for unemployment under this act;

“Benefit year” means:

The fifty-two (52) consecutive calendar week period beginning the first week of a claim series established by the filing of a valid initial claim for benefits following the termination of any previously established benefit year; or

The fifty-three (53) consecutive calendar week period beginning the first week of a claim series if filing a new valid claim results in the overlapping of any quarter of the base period of a previously filed claim; or

If a combined wage claim under W.S.

27-3-608

, the benefit year is as provided under law of the paying state.

“Calendar quarter” means a period of three (3) consecutive calendar months ending on March 31, June 30, September 30 or December 31;

“Commission” means the unemployment insurance commission of Wyoming within the department of workforce services;

“Contribution” means payments to the unemployment compensation fund required by this act including payments instead of contributions under W.S.

27-3-509

;

“Employing unit” means any individual or type of organization employing one (1) or more individuals in this state including any partnership, association, trust, estate, corporation, domestic or foreign insurance company or corporation, a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or a successor or the legal representative of a deceased person and including any limited liability corporation. Also, any individual or organization not previously subject to this act shall be an employing unit upon acquiring any entity already subject to this act. An individual performing services within this state for any employing unit maintaining two (2) or more separate places of business in the state is employed by a single employing unit. An individual employed to perform for or assist any agent or employee of an employing unit is employed by the employing unit whether hired or paid directly by the employing unit or by the agent or employee if the employing unit had actual or constructive knowledge of the work;

“Employment office” means a free public employment office or branch operated by any state as part of a state controlled system of public employment offices or by a federal agency administering an unemployment compensation program or a system of free public employment offices;

“Fund” means the unemployment compensation fund established by this act;

“Hospital” means any institution, building or agency maintaining, furnishing or offering hospitalization of the sick and injured or chronic or convalescent care by individuals employed by the state or any political subdivision;

“Institution of higher education” means any college or university in this state and any other public or nonprofit educational institution:

Admitting as regular students only high school graduates or the recognized equivalent;

Legally authorized to provide post secondary education in this state; and

Providing an educational program for which a bachelor’s or higher degree is awarded or which is accepted as full credit toward this degree, providing a program of postgraduate or postdoctoral study or a training program preparing students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation.

“Insured work” means employment for employers;

“Nonprofit hospital” means any institution performing services specified by paragraph (x) of this subsection and organized and operated under W.S. 35-2-302(a)(vi) and authority of the state department of health;

“State” means any of the fifty (50) states of the United States, the District of Columbia, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico or the Virgin Islands;

“Unemployment” means any week in which an individual performs no services and receives no wages or performs less than full-time work if wages payable for that week are less than his weekly benefit amount and are in accordance with regulations of the commission;

“Valid claim” means a claim filed by an individual earning wages for insured work in amounts specified under W.S. 27-3-306(d) for which no misrepresentation is made of unemployment requirements of this act;

“United States” used in a geographical sense means the fifty (50) states, the District of Columbia, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands;

“Wage” means remuneration payable for services from any source including commissions, bonuses and cash. The reasonable cash value of remuneration other than cash or check shall be prescribed by rule of the commission. To the extent the following are not considered wages under 26 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3311, “wage” does not include:

For purposes of W.S.

27-3-503

through

27-3-509

, remuneration greater than fifty-five percent (55%) of the statewide average annual wage calculated pursuant to W.S. 27-3-303(a) and rounded to the lowest one hundred dollars ($100.00), which is paid during any calendar year to an individual by each employer or a predecessor within any calendar year including employment under any other state unemployment compensation law unless the amount is subject to a federal tax against which credit may be taken for contributions paid into any state unemployment fund;

Any premium paid by an employing unit under a plan, system or into a fund for insurance or annuities to provide an employee or class of employees retirement, sickness or accident disability, medical and hospitalization expenses for sickness or accident disability or death benefits if the employee cannot receive any part of this payment instead of the death benefit or any part of the premium if the benefit is insured and cannot assign or receive cash instead of the benefit upon withdrawal from or termination of the plan, system, policy or services with the employing unit;

A payment by an employing unit not deducted from an employee’s remuneration for the tax imposed under 26 U.S.C. § 3101;

Dismissal payments which the employing unit is not obligated to make;

That portion of tips or gratuities not reportable under 26 U.S.C. § 3306(s);

The value of any meals or lodging furnished by and for the convenience of the employer to the employee if the meals are furnished on the business premises of the employer or in the case of lodging, the employee is required to accept lodging on the business premises of his employer as a condition of his employment;

Remuneration received by an employee as sick pay following a six (6) month continuous period of illness;

Any benefit under a cafeteria plan specified by 26 U.S.C. § 125, excluding cash;

Wages of a deceased worker paid to a beneficiary or estate following the calendar year of the worker’s death;

Services received under any dependent care assistance program to the extent excluded from gross income under 26 U.S.C. § 129;

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 66, § 2.

Services or benefits received under any educational assistance program;

Any benefit or other value received under an employee achievement award;

The value of any qualified group legal services plan to the extent payments are excluded from gross income under 26 U.S.C. § 120;

Costs of group term life insurance;

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 66, § 2.

Any moving expenses;

Employer contributions to any qualified retirement and pension plan or individual retirement account and distributions from qualified retirement and pension plans and annuities under 26 U.S.C. § 403(b);

Benefit payments under any supplemental unemployment compensation plan; and

Any benefits paid under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act or any other worker’s compensation law of another state.

“Week” means a period of seven (7) consecutive calendar days beginning Sunday and the commission may by regulation prescribe that a week is within the benefit year which includes the greater part of that week;

“Department” means the divisions within the department of workforce services established under W.S.

9-2-2002

which contain the principal operating units that administer the unemployment compensation program pursuant to the Social Security Act;

“Casual labor” means service not within the normal course of business and for which the remuneration paid is less than fifty dollars ($50.00);

“Erroneous payment” means a payment that, but for the failure by the employer or the employer’s agent to provide requested information with respect to the claim for unemployment compensation, would not have been made;

“Pattern of failing” means repeated documented failure on the part of the employer or the agent of the employer to respond to a written request from the department for information relating to a claim for benefits, taking into consideration the number of instances of failure in relation to the total volume of requests by the department to the employer or the employer’s agent;

“Misconduct connected with work” means an act of an employee which indicates an intentional disregard of the employer’s interests or the commonly accepted duties, obligations and responsibilities of an employee. “Misconduct connected with work” does not include:

Ordinary negligence in isolated instances;

Good faith errors in judgment or discretion;

Inefficiency or failure in good performance as the result of inability or incapacity.

“This act” means W.S.

27-3-101

through

27-3-811

.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1, ch. 131, § 1; ch. 161, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; ch. 221, § 2; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 74, § 1; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 177, § 1; 2010, ch. 66, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 20, § 2, effective February 9, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(xxii), substituted “27-3-705” for “27-3-704.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), deleted the last sentence in (xviii)(A), and substituted “27-3-706” for “27-3-705” in (xxii).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), repealed (a)(xviii)(M) and (a)(xviii)(R), pertaining to wages paid to disabled worker and loan repayment, and rewrote (a)(xxi), which formerly read: “ ‘Casual labor’ means service of less than two (2) consecutive weeks and not within the normal course of business.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(v) and (a)(xx).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added present (a)(xxiv), and redesignated former (a)(xxiv) as (a)(xxv).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(xxii) and (a)(xxiii) and redesignated former (a)(xxii) as (a)(xxiv).

The 2021 amendment,

in (a), added "Except as otherwise provided," at the beginning and made a related change; and substituted "27-3-811" for "27-3-706" in (a)(xxv).

Laws 2021, ch. 20, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 9, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(xviii)(I), (L) or (V) and no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Isolated incident of ordinary negligence was not misconduct.—

Former school
principal was entitled to unemployment insurance benefits because
there was not substantial evidence that the teacher engaged in misconduct.
Even if the principal should not have left the school building and
should have, instead, immediately pulled a student out of class and
contacted a staff member to perform an assessment when a school counselor
reported that the student appeared to be overly tired, the principal's
action was, at most, ordinary negligence in an isolated instance or
a good faith error in judgment or discretion. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. v. Kinneman, 2016 WY 79, 377 P.3d 776,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2016).

“Usual course of business.” —

Decisions dealing with liability under Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law are helpful in construing words “usual course of business” when used. Wyoming Unemployment Compensation Act. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Mathews, 56 Wyo. 479, 111 P.2d 111,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1941).

Misconduct connected with work.—

Denial of
an applicant's request for unemployment insurance benefits was appropriate
because the applicant was fired for misconduct connected with the
applicant's work in that the applicant intentionally disregarded
the
employer's interest and/or the applicant's commonly accepted
duties.
Although a supervisor informed the applicant of the importance
of
not mixing product when the applicant was hired as a fuel truck
driver,
and the applicant was trained in how to unload fuel, the
applicant
twice mixed product when employed for two months. Clark v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 89, 378 P.3d 310,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2016).

Denial of applicant’s request for unemployment insurance benefits was appropriate because the applicant was discharged for misconduct connected with the applicant’s work as a police dispatcher in that the applicant disclosed documents containing confidential information to a city council member, who was not authorized to receive them. The applicant showed an intentional disregard for the city’s and police department’s interests in protecting confidential information and maintaining the chain of command to address reported policy violations. Mahoney v. City of Gillette, 2019 WY 28, 436 P.3d 444,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2019).

Term “account for”

means to pay over the money to the person entitled thereto and stands in opposition to the right of appropriation to one's own use and benefit. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Great W. Hotel Management, 452 P.2d 211,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1969).

Back pay. —

Back pay should be considered a wage and, for purposes of the Wyoming Employment Security Law (WESA), an employee receiving back pay as a result of a National Labor Relations Board (NLRB) award, a judgment, an arbitration proceeding or a negotiated settlement following a period of separation from his or her employment, has received a wage. Bettcher v. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, 884 P.2d 635,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1994).

Tips are not wages.

Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Great W. Hotel Management, 452 P.2d 211,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1969).

But parties have right by explicit contract to agree that tips will be wages,

and only when so contracting does the employer become entitled to have tips credited upon wages paid the employee. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Great W. Hotel Management, 452 P.2d 211,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1969).

Quoted

in

Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Laramie Cabs, Inc., 700 P.2d 399,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1985); Wyo. Dep't of Empl. v. Jolley, Castillo, Drennon, Ltd., 2010 WY 48, 229 P.3d 955,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Apr. 22, 2010).

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Taxicab driver as employee of owner of cab or as independent contractor within social security and unemployment insurance statutes, 10 ALR2d 369.

Salesman on commission as within act, 29 ALR2d 751.

What constitutes “agricultural labor” or “farm labor,” within Social Security or Unemployment Compensation Acts, 53 ALR2d 406.

Insurance agents or salesmen as within coverage of social security or unemployment compensation acts, 39 ALR3d 872.

Part-time or intermittent workers as covered by or as eligible for benefits under state unemployment compensation act, 95 ALR3d 891.

§ 27-3-103.
“Employer” defined; qualifications; employment services in other states included.

As used in this act, “employer” means any employing unit:

For whom a worker performs service as an employee;

Acquiring the organization, business, trade or substantially all of the assets of an employer subject to this act at the time of acquisition;

Electing coverage under this act pursuant to W.S. 27-3-502(d);

Not otherwise qualifying as an employer under this section and liable for any federal tax on services employed against which credit may be taken for contribution payments into any state unemployment fund;

Not otherwise qualifying as an employer under this section and as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by 26 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3311, is required to be an employer under this act;

Employing services defined as employment under W.S. 27-3-105(a)(i), except as provided by paragraphs (viii) and (ix) of this subsection;

Employing services defined as employment under W.S. 27-3-105(a)(ii), except as provided by subsection (b) of this section;

Employing agricultural labor defined under W.S.

27-3-107

;

Employing domestic service defined under W.S.

27-3-107

(g); or

That is an Indian tribe, as defined by section 3306 of the federal Unemployment Tax Act, for which service in employment, as defined by this act, is performed.

Domestic service shall not be considered by the department in determining if an employing unit is an employer under paragraph (a)(i), (vi), (vii) or (viii) of this section. Agricultural labor shall not be considered by the department in determining if an employing unit is an employer under paragraph (a)(i), (vi), (vii) or (ix) of this section.

Employment under this section shall include services performed entirely within another state pursuant to an agreement under W.S. 27-3-608(b) and otherwise qualifying as employment under this act.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; 2001, ch. 67, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), twice substituted “paragraph” for “paragraphs” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Unemployment Tax Act. —

Section 3306 of the federal Unemployment Tax Act appears as 26 U.S.C. § 3306.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” as used in this section, see
§ 27-3-102(a)(xxiv).

Employer-employee relationship. —

See notes under §

27-3-104

.

Quoted

in

Wyo. Dep't of Empl. v. Jolley, Castillo, Drennon, Ltd., 2010 WY 48, 229 P.3d 955,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Apr. 22, 2010).

§ 27-3-104.
“Employment” defined; generally; exceptions.

As used in this act, “employment” means service:

Performed by an employee defined under 26 U.S.C. § 3306(i) including service in interstate commerce, except 26 U.S.C. § 3121(d)(2) does not apply;

Subject to any federal tax against which credit may be taken for contribution payments into any state unemployment fund;

Required to be employment under this act as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by 26 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3311; and

Otherwise specified under W.S.

27-3-104

through

27-3-108

.

An individual who performs service for wages is an employee for purposes of this act unless it is shown that the individual:

Is free from control or direction over the details of the performance of services by contract and by fact;

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 153, § 1.

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 121, § 3.

Represents his services to the public as a self-employed individual or an independent contractor; and

May substitute another individual to perform his services.

As used in this act, “employment” does not include service performed by a person acting as a fiduciary, as that term is defined in W.S. 4-10-103(a)(vii), and receiving reasonable compensation for fiduciary services pursuant to the Uniform Trust Code or the Wyoming Probate Code.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1991, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 121, §§ 2, 3; 2014 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Test of employer-employee relationship

is whether either of the parties possesses the right to terminate the services at will, without incurring liability to the other, an affirmative answer establishing the status of master and servant. Ben Realty Co. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 416 P.2d 220,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1966).

Where the trial court finds the relationship of employer and employee to exist, the supreme court will examine to ascertain if the finding is sustained by substantial evidence. Ben Realty Co. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 416 P.2d 220,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1966).

Wyoming Unemployment Insurance Commission (Commission) properly found that services provided by 16 flow testers for oil field services company were covered employment under the Wyoming Employment Security Law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-3-101

et seq., because there was a lack of sufficient evidence in the record which would have demonstrated any instance in which a flow tester represented himself as an independent contractor to the client oil companies. DC Prod. Serv. v. Wyo. Dep't of Empl., 2002 WY 142, 54 P.3d 768,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2002).

Burden of proof. —

Wyoming Department of Unemployment Insurance Commission's decision that the partnership had payroll for services paid in Wyoming from 2004 through 2006 was supported by substantial evidence and the partnership failed to prove that its consultants were independent contractors, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-3-104(b).
Wyo. Dep't of Empl. v. Jolley, Castillo, Drennon, Ltd., 2010 WY 48, 229 P.3d 955,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2010).

Relationship of independent contractor. —

Each case involving question whether or not relationship is that of independent contractor must be decided upon its own facts. Wyoming Unemployment Compensation Act. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Mathews, 56 Wyo. 479, 111 P.2d 111,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1941).

One who deals with independent contractor is not required to pay unemployment compensation contributions under the law. Wyoming Unemployment Compensation Act. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Mathews, 56 Wyo. 479, 111 P.2d 111,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1941).

Where leaders of orchestras employed, paid and controlled their associates without substantial interference from owner of cafe and bar in which orchestras played, leaders were “independent contractors” and owner was not liable for unemployment compensation to those employed by leaders. Wyoming Unemployment Compensation Act. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Mathews, 56 Wyo. 479, 111 P.2d 111,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1941).

Following services indicated that individual worked as employee, rather than independent contractor:

his employer visited him on the job site several times a day, gave direction as to the work in progress, interrupted work to take him to other job sites, and required him to work on many different projects each week. Scott v. Fagan, 684 P.2d 805,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1984).

Real estate salesman may be either employee or independent contractor. —

The occupation of real estate salesman, insofar as the Unemployment Insurance Act was concerned, has been held to be one that may be classified as that of an employee or an independent contractor, depending upon the facts of the particular case. Ben Realty Co. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 416 P.2d 220,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1966).

Association of real estate salesmen with broker held to constitute “employment”. Ben Realty Co. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 416 P.2d 220,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1966).

Barbers. —

Where barber work was done by barbers in operator's shop on percentage basis, shop being licensed, leased and controlled by operator, who also controlled scope of work and supplied materials (but not tools), operator held liable for contributions under Unemployment Compensation Act. Tharp v. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n, 57 Wyo. 486, 121 P.2d 172,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1942).

Musicians. —

Where musicians playing in cafe or bar were free from control or direction by owner over their performances, supplied own instruments, except piano, and orchestra leader alone contracted with owner, latter held not liable under Wyoming Unemployment Compensation Act. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Mathews, 56 Wyo. 479, 111 P.2d 111,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1941).

Taxicab drivers. —

Taxicab drivers who leased cabs from a taxicab service, which held city and state permits, furnished gas, oil and other supplies, carried liability insurance, paid license fees and maintained and furnished the capital to purchase the cabs and other equipment, in exchange for a percentage of the fares, were “employees” within the meaning of subsection (b). Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Laramie Cabs, 700 P.2d 399,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1985).

Housing consultant. —

The claimant, a housing consultant, was an employee within the meaning of the statute, notwithstanding that she filed a self-employed Form 1099 with the Internal Revenue Service, where she (1) conducted sales of manufactured homes, performed income analyses of prospective customers, and assisted customers in filling out credit applications, (2) was paid an hourly wage and also received a bonus based upon sales, (3) was not free from control or direction over the details of the performance of services, and (4) did not represent her services to the public as a self-employed individual or an independent contractor. Hat Six Homes, Inc. v. Department of Empl., 6 P.3d 1287,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2000).

Misrepresentation. —

Claimant for unemployment compensation benefits was disqualified where he stated on his application that he did not work for wages, but rather, he rented his welding equipment and then operated it for free. Judge v. Dep't of Empl., 2002 WY 109, 50 P.3d 686,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Sierra Trading Post, Inc. v. Hinson,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 27

, 996 P.2d 1144 (Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Wyoming Real Estate Broker v. Employment Security Commission,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 70 (1964).

§ 27-3-105.
“Employment” defined; employment for state, and other organizations; exceptions.

Employment under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] includes service performed for:

This state, any of its political subdivisions, including service as an appointed official of any political subdivision, or for this state and any other state or its political subdivisions and this service is excluded from employment under 26 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3311 solely by 26 U.S.C. § 3306(c)(7);

A religious, charitable, educational or other organization if excluded from employment under 26 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3311 solely by 26 U.S.C. § 3306(c)(8) and the organization employed four (4) or more individuals for part of one (1) day for twenty (20) weeks within the current or preceding calendar year; and

An Indian tribe, as defined by section 3306 of the federal Unemployment Tax Act, if the service is excluded from employment, as defined by the federal Unemployment Tax Act, only because of the application of section 3306(c)(7) of that act and is not otherwise excluded from employment as defined by this act.

Subsection (a) of this section does not include service performed:

For a church or convention or association of churches;

For an organization operated primarily for religious purposes and supervised, controlled or principally supported by a church or convention or association of churches;

As an ordained, commissioned or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of his ministry;

As a member of a religious order in the exercise of required duties of the order;

As an elected official;

As a member of a legislative body or the judiciary of the state or any political subdivision;

As a member of the state national guard or air national guard;

For a governmental agency as a temporary employee for fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood or similar emergencies;

By a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position pursuant to law or by a policymaking or advisory position not ordinarily requiring more than eight (8) hours of service per week;

By an individual receiving rehabilitative services from a facility providing rehabilitation programs for individuals with impaired earning capacities because of age, physical or mental deficiencies or injury or providing remunerative work for individuals not readily absorbed into the labor market because of physical or mental deficiencies;

By an individual receiving a wage as part of a work experience or workfare program assisted or financed by the federal government or any state or local government, except for those programs employing an individual in on-the-job training for which wages are wholly or partially paid by the employer;

By an inmate of a state custodial or penal institution; or

As an election official or election worker if the amount of remuneration received by the individual during the calendar year for services performed as an election official or election worker is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; ch. 161, § 2; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1998, ch. 55, § 1; 2001, ch. 67, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

made stylistic changes in (a)(i), (a)(ii), (b)(xi) and (b)(xii).

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Employer-employee relationship. —

See notes under §

27-3-104

.

Unemployment Tax Act. —

Section 3306 of the federal Unemployment Tax Act appears as 26 U.S.C. § 3306.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”